Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5217XS (11) 91 da/js S.F. 2305 Section 1. Section 459.312, subsection 10, paragraph h, 1 Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 h. A description of land identified protocol for the 3 application of liquid manure due to an emergency circumstance 4 if allowed pursuant to section 459.313A . The owner protocol 5 must identify the land in the original manure management plan 6 or in the next updated manure management plan required to 7 be submitted to the department following the designated for 8 emergency application. 9 Sec. 2. Section 459.313, Code 2026, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 459.313 Manure application ââ rules . 12 1. The department shall adopt rules governing the 13 application of manure originating from an anaerobic lagoon or 14 aerobic structure which is part of a confinement animal feeding 15 operation. The rules shall establish application rates and 16 practices to minimize groundwater or surface water pollution 17 resulting from application, including pollution caused by 18 runoff or other manure flow resulting from precipitation 19 events. The rules shall establish different application rates 20 and practices based on the water holding capacity of the soil 21 at the time of application. 22 2. A person shall not apply manure by spray irrigation 23 equipment, except as provided by rules adopted by the 24 department pursuant to chapter 17A . However, a person shall 25 not use restricted spray irrigation equipment to apply manure , 26 including effluent, originating from a confinement an animal 27 feeding operation, unless the manure has been diluted as 28 provided by rules adopted by the department, including diluted 29 by use of an anaerobic lagoon. 30 3. A person shall not apply manure unless, within 31 twenty-four hours after surface application, the manure is 32 injected or incorporated into the upper four inches or more of 33 soil. 34 4. A person shall not apply manure on saturated ground, snow 35 -1- LSB 5217XS (11) 91 da/js 1/ 6 S.F. 2305 covered ground, or frozen ground except as provided in section 1 459.313A. 2 Sec. 3. Section 459.313A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 459.313A Application of manure on land ââ saturated ground, 5 snow covered ground and , or frozen ground. 6 1. A person may apply manure originating from an animal 7 feeding operation on saturated ground, snow covered ground , 8 or frozen ground , except to the extent otherwise provided by 9 applicable requirements in this section , this chapter , or the 10 national pollutant discharge elimination system pursuant to 11 the federal Water Pollution Control Act , 33 U.S.C. ch. 26, as 12 amended , and 40 C.F.R. pts. 122 and 412 only under an emergency 13 circumstance . 14 1. 2. During the period beginning December 21 and ending 15 April 1, the person may apply liquid manure originating from 16 a manure storage structure, that is part of a confinement 17 feeding operation, on snow covered ground only when there is 18 an emergency. During the period beginning February 1 and 19 ending April 1, the person may apply liquid manure originating 20 from a manure storage structure, that is part of a confinement 21 feeding operation, on frozen ground only when there is an 22 emergency. An emergency circumstance occurs only when there is 23 an immediate need to comply with section 459.311, subsection 1 , 24 due to unforeseen circumstances affecting the storage of the 25 liquid manure. The unforeseen circumstances must be beyond 26 the control of the owner of the confinement animal feeding 27 operation, including but not limited to natural disaster, 28 unusual weather conditions, or equipment or structural failure. 29 A person who is authorized to apply liquid manure on saturated 30 ground, snow covered ground , or frozen ground when there is an 31 emergency shall comply with all of the following: 32 a. The person must contact the department by telephone prior 33 to the application. 34 b. (1) The For manure originating from a confinement 35 -2- LSB 5217XS (11) 91 da/js 2/ 6 S.F. 2305 animal feeding operation, the person must apply the liquid 1 manure on land identified for such application in a manure 2 management plan according to an emergency circumstance protocol 3 submitted by the owner of the confinement feeding operation 4 to the department as part of the ownerâs manure management 5 plan as provided in section 459.312 . The owner of the 6 confinement feeding operation must identify the land in the 7 manure management plan prior to the application. The owner 8 must identify the land in the original manure management plan 9 or in the next updated manure management plan required to be 10 submitted to the department following the application. 11 (2) For manure originating from an open feedlot operation, 12 the person must apply the manure, including any effluent, on 13 land according to an emergency circumstance protocol submitted 14 by the owner of the open feedlot operation to the department 15 as part of the ownerâs nutrient management plan as provided in 16 section 459A.208. 17 c. The liquid manure must be applied on a field with a 18 phosphorus index rating of two or less. 19 d. Any surface water drain tile intake that is on land in 20 the ownerâs manure management plan and located down gradient 21 of the application must be temporarily blocked beginning not 22 later than the time that the liquid manure is first applied and 23 ending not earlier than two weeks after the completion of the 24 application. 25 2. 3. The authorization to apply liquid manure in 26 subsection 1 does not apply to any of the following: 27 a. An an immediate need to comply with section 459.311, 28 subsection 1 , caused by the improper design or management of 29 the a manure storage structure, including but not limited to a 30 failure to properly account for the volume of the manure to be 31 stored. 32 b. Liquid manure originating from a manure storage structure 33 constructed or expanded on or after July 1, 2009, if the manure 34 storage structure has a capacity to store manure for less than 35 -3- LSB 5217XS (11) 91 da/js 3/ 6 S.F. 2305 one hundred eighty days. 1 3. 4. Subsections 1 and 2 through 3 do not apply to any of 2 the following: 3 a. The application of liquid manure originating from a small 4 animal feeding operation. 5 b. The application of liquid manure and injection into the 6 soil or incorporation within the soil on the same date. 7 Sec. 4. Section 459A.208, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 8 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A protocol for the application of manure 10 due to an emergency circumstance if allowed pursuant to section 11 459.313A. The protocol must identify land designated for 12 emergency application. 13